src-fst-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
* Noun 38 kuld examples:*
* *kuld* `kuld+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *kulla* `kuld+N+Sg+Gen:`
* *kulda* `kuld+N+Sg+Par:`
* *kulda* `kuld+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *kullast* `kuld+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *kullalõ* `kuld+N+Sg+All:`
* *kullal* `kuld+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *kullalt* `kuld+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *kullas* `kuld+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *kullaniq* `kuld+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *kullaldaq* `kuld+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *kullagaq* `kuld+N+Sg+Com:`
* *kullaq* `kuld+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *kuldõ* `kuld+N+Pl+Par:`
* *kuldõhe* `kuld+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *kullõst* `kuld+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *kullõlõ* `kuld+N+Pl+All:`
* *kullõl* `kuld+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *kullõlt* `kuld+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *kullõs* `kuld+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *kullõniq* `kuld+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *kullõldaq* `kuld+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *kuldõgaq* `kuld+N+Pl+Com:`

Derived from PUHM, Gradation="yes", stem="+Sg+Nom"
stem_vowel="o"

* +Err/Orth-no-pal:%^StrGStem%^NoPAL        Harm_Neutr_SG-NOM  ;  no final palatal

* juht́ examples:*
* *juht́:* `juht́+N+Sg+Nom`
* *juhi:* `juht́+N+Sg+Gen`
* *juhtõ:* `juht́+N+Sg+Par`
* *juhtõ:* `juht́+N+Sg+Ill`
* *juhin:* `juht́+N+Sg+Ine`
* *juhist:* `juht́+N+Sg+Ela`
* *juhilõ:* `juht́+N+Sg+All`
* *juhil:* `juht́+N+Sg+Ade`
* *juhilt:* `juht́+N+Sg+Abl`
* *juhis:* `juht́+N+Sg+Tra`
* *juhiniq:* `juht́+N+Sg+Ter`
* *juhildaq:* `juht́+N+Sg+Abe`
* *juhigaq:* `juht́+N+Sg+Com`
* *juhiq:* `juht́+N+Pl+Nom`
* *juhõ:* `juht́+N+Pl+Gen`
* *juhtõ:* `juht́+N+Pl+Par`
* *juhtõhõ:* `juht́+N+Pl+Ill`
* *juhõn:* `juht́+N+Pl+Ine`
* *juhõst:* `juht́+N+Pl+Ela`
* *juhõlõ:* `juht́+N+Pl+All`
* *juhõl:* `juht́+N+Pl+Ade`
* *juhõlt:* `juht́+N+Pl+Abl`
* *juhõs:* `juht́+N+Pl+Tra`
* *juhõniq:* `juht́+N+Pl+Ter`
* *juhõldaq:* `juht́+N+Pl+Abe`
* *juhõgaq:* `juht́+N+Pl+Com`

* :%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^JI20       SG-GEN_ZERO-STEM        ;  vaŕo
* +Err/Orth-no-pal:%^Pen%^NoPAL%^Pen%^JI20       SG-GEN_ZERO-STEM        ;  vaŕo

* :%^Pen%^NoPAL%^Pen%^JI2J%^VowRM%>õ    PL-GEN_ZERO ;  varjõ

* LEXICON NMN_42TUEHI  tühi:tüh

* :ä       SG-GEN_ZERO-STEM        ;  vaŕo

* :e    PL-GEN_ZERO ;  varjõ

* kanarik # examples:*
* *kanarik:* `kanarik+N+Sg+Nom`
* *kanarigu:* `kanarik+N+Sg+Gen`
* *kanarikku:* `kanarik+N+Sg+Par`
* *kanarikku:* `kanarik+N+Sg+Ill`
* *kanarigun:* `kanarik+N+Sg+Ine`
* *kanarigust:* `kanarik+N+Sg+Ela`
* *kanarigulõ:* `kanarik+N+Sg+All`
* *kanarigul:* `kanarik+N+Sg+Ade`
* *kanarigult:* `kanarik+N+Sg+Abl`
* *kanarigus:* `kanarik+N+Sg+Tra`
* *kanariguniq:* `kanarik+N+Sg+Ter`
* *kanariguldaq:* `kanarik+N+Sg+Abe`
* *kanarigugaq:* `kanarik+N+Sg+Com`
* *kanariguq:* `kanarik+N+Pl+Nom`
* *kanarikkõ:* `kanarik+N+Pl+Gen`
* *kanarikkõ:* `kanarik+N+Pl+Par`
* *kanarikkõhe:* `kanarik+N+Pl+Ill`
* *kanarigõn:* `kanarik+N+Pl+Ine`
* *kanarigõst:* `kanarik+N+Pl+Ela`
* *kanarigõlõ:* `kanarik+N+Pl+All`
* *kanarigõl:* `kanarik+N+Pl+Ade`
* *kanarigõlt:* `kanarik+N+Pl+Abl`
* *kanarigõs:* `kanarik+N+Pl+Tra`
* *kanarigõniq:* `kanarik+N+Pl+Ter`
* *kanarigõldaq:* `kanarik+N+Pl+Abe`
* *kanarigõgaq:* `kanarik+N+Pl+Com`

* saslõḱ # examples:*
* *saslõḱ:* `saslõḱ+N+Sg+Nom`
* *saslõgi:* `saslõḱ+N+Sg+Gen`
* *saslõkki:* `saslõḱ+N+Sg+Par`
* *saslõkki:* `saslõḱ+N+Sg+Ill`
* *saslõgin:* `saslõḱ+N+Sg+Ine`
* *saslõgist:* `saslõḱ+N+Sg+Ela`
* *saslõgilõ:* `saslõḱ+N+Sg+All`
* *saslõgil:* `saslõḱ+N+Sg+Ade`
* *saslõgilt:* `saslõḱ+N+Sg+Abl`
* *saslõgis:* `saslõḱ+N+Sg+Tra`
* *saslõginiq:* `saslõḱ+N+Sg+Ter`
* *saslõgildaq:* `saslõḱ+N+Sg+Abe`
* *saslõgigaq:* `saslõḱ+N+Sg+Com`
* *saslõgiq:* `saslõḱ+N+Pl+Nom`
* *saslõkke:* `saslõḱ+N+Pl+Gen`
* *saslõkke:* `saslõḱ+N+Pl+Par`
* *saslõkkehe:* `saslõḱ+N+Pl+Ill`
* *saslõgen:* `saslõḱ+N+Pl+Ine`
* *saslõgest:* `saslõḱ+N+Pl+Ela`
* *saslõgelõ:* `saslõḱ+N+Pl+All`
* *saslõgel:* `saslõḱ+N+Pl+Ade`
* *saslõgelt:* `saslõḱ+N+Pl+Abl`
* *saslõges:* `saslõḱ+N+Pl+Tra`
* *saslõgeniq:* `saslõḱ+N+Pl+Ter`
* *saslõgeldaq:* `saslõḱ+N+Pl+Abe`
* *saslõgegaq:* `saslõḱ+N+Pl+Com`

* apriĺ # examples:*
* *apriĺ:* `apriĺ+N+Sg+Nom`
* *aprili:* `apriĺ+N+Sg+Gen`
* *aprilli:* `apriĺ+N+Sg+Par`
* *aprilli:* `apriĺ+N+Sg+Ill`
* *aprilin:* `apriĺ+N+Sg+Ine`
* *aprilist:* `apriĺ+N+Sg+Ela`
* *aprililõ:* `apriĺ+N+Sg+All`
* *aprilil:* `apriĺ+N+Sg+Ade`
* *aprililt:* `apriĺ+N+Sg+Abl`
* *aprilis:* `apriĺ+N+Sg+Tra`
* *apriliniq:* `apriĺ+N+Sg+Ter`
* *aprilildaq:* `apriĺ+N+Sg+Abe`
* *apriligaq:* `apriĺ+N+Sg+Com`
* *apriliq:* `apriĺ+N+Pl+Nom`
* *aprille:* `apriĺ+N+Pl+Gen`
* *aprille:* `apriĺ+N+Pl+Par`
* *aprillehe:* `apriĺ+N+Pl+Ill`
* *aprilen:* `apriĺ+N+Pl+Ine`
* *aprilest:* `apriĺ+N+Pl+Ela`
* *aprilelõ:* `apriĺ+N+Pl+All`
* *aprilel:* `apriĺ+N+Pl+Ade`
* *aprilelt:* `apriĺ+N+Pl+Abl`
* *apriles:* `apriĺ+N+Pl+Tra`
* *aprileniq:* `apriĺ+N+Pl+Ter`
* *aprileldaq:* `apriĺ+N+Pl+Abe`
* *aprilegaq:* `apriĺ+N+Pl+Com`

* LEXICON NMN_44SWDA  sõda:sõ%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a
gradation: yes

* sõda examples:*
* *sõda:* `sõda+N+Sg+Nom`
* *sõa:* `sõda+N+Sg+Gen`
* *sõta:* `sõda+N+Sg+Par`
* *sõtta:* `sõda+N+Sg+Ill`
* *sõan:* `sõda+N+Sg+Ine`
* *sõast:* `sõda+N+Sg+Ela`
* *sõalõ:* `sõda+N+Sg+All`
* *sõal:* `sõda+N+Sg+Ade`
* *sõalt:* `sõda+N+Sg+Abl`
* *sõas:* `sõda+N+Sg+Tra`
* *sõaniq:* `sõda+N+Sg+Ter`
* *sõaldaq:* `sõda+N+Sg+Abe`
* *sõagaq:* `sõda+N+Sg+Com`
* *sõaq:* `sõda+N+Pl+Nom`
* *sõto:* `sõda+N+Pl+Gen`
* *sõto:* `sõda+N+Pl+Par`
* *sõttohe:* `sõda+N+Pl+Ill`
* *sõton:* `sõda+N+Pl+Ine`
* *sõtost:* `sõda+N+Pl+Ela`
* *sõtolõ:* `sõda+N+Pl+All`
* *sõtol:* `sõda+N+Pl+Ade`
* *sõtolt:* `sõda+N+Pl+Abl`
* *sõtos:* `sõda+N+Pl+Tra`
* *sõtoniq:* `sõda+N+Pl+Ter`
* *sõtoldaq:* `sõda+N+Pl+Abe`
* *sõtogaq:* `sõda+N+Pl+Com`

* LEXICON NMN_45KANA/RIHAE  kana:ka%{nØ%}n%{ao%}
* Yaml: **N-kana45**

LEXICON NMN_46HAIN   jalg:jalg
gradation: no

LEXICON NMN_46TARK   jalg:jal%{gØ%}
gradation: yes

* LEXICON NMN_47ASI  asi:a%{sś%}%{jiØ%}

* :%^NoPAL%^VowRM%>ö       PL-ALL_lE-STEM ;  IS THIS A REAL FORM?

* LEXICON NMN_2KASUNUQ/ELAENUEQ  elänüq:elänü

### SINGULAR GENITIVE STEMS

### PLURAL ALLATIVE STEMS

### TAGS THAT CAN BE FOLLOWED BY CLITICS "K"
### PLURAL TAGS
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Pl+Abe:%>ld%{aä%} K ;  no q

### SINGULAR TAGS

* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Sg+Com:%>ga K ;  no q
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Err/Orth-front+Sg+Com:%>gä K ;  no q, front
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth-no-q+Sg+Com:%>ga BACK_K ;  no q

LEXICON Harm_Neutr_SG-INE_hn  RARE

### TAGS THAT CANNOT BE FOLLOWED BY CLITICS

### CASES ONLY

### TAGS THAT CAN BE FOLLOWED BY CLITICS

### TAGS WITH NO ADDED MORPHOLOGY THAT CANNOT BE FOLLOWED BY CLITICS

digits

* **LEXICON SASCont ** FROM NUMERALS, gives -aastanõ etc.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vro/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
